Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-120 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Legislature finds that technology in the classroom
including artificial intelligence is increasingly present and
pervasive in educational environments. Classroom teachers play an
essential and irreplaceable role in a student’s educational career,
and artificial intelligence tools, when used in classrooms, should
supplement educator-led instruction, not supplant it. The absence
of consistent guardrails for student-facing emerging technologies
may increase risks to student data privacy and instructional
integrity.
B. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma
Responsible Technology in Schools Act”. The purpose of the act is
to provide clarity, accountability, and consistency by:
1. Establishing principles and guardrails for the appropriate
and responsible use of artificial intelligence in public school
districts in this state;
2. Protecting student data, privacy, and educational integrity;
3. Preserving local control and educator discretion; and
4. Supporting transparency to students and families.
C. As used in this act:
1. “Artificial intelligence” or “AI” means a system or
application consistent with the definition set forth in 15 U.S.C.,
Section 9401(3);
2. “Classroom AI tool” means an artificial intelligence
application used to support instruction, learning activities,
assessment assistance, or educator workflows in a school setting;
3. “Educator-directed AI use” means use of an artificial
intelligence tool under the supervision and professional judgment of
a teacher or school employee;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1734 Page 2

4. “Student-facing AI tool” means an artificial intelligence
tool designed for use by students that provides AI-generated
content, feedback, or assistance as part of an instructional
activity; and
5. “Human-in-the-loop” means that an educator or authorized
school employee maintains oversight, review, and final decision-
making authority over outputs generated by an artificial
intelligence tool.
D. Artificial intelligence tools used for instructional or
educational purposes in public school districts in this state shall
be implemented under the direction of an educator, subject to
applicable law and the policy of the school district board of
education.
E. If artificial intelligence is used in a public school
district in this state, such use shall be subject to the following:
1. All classroom AI tools shall be deployed through educator-
directed AI use. The responsibility for decisions informed by
artificial intelligence shall remain with school employees and shall
not be delegated to an artificial intelligence system or vendor;
2. Classroom AI tools and student-facing AI tools shall operate
with a human-in-the-loop. Outputs generated by artificial
intelligence shall be reviewed by an educator or authorized school
employee prior to use in instruction, feedback, assessment, or
decision-making;
3. Artificial intelligence tools shall not be used as the
primary basis for student grading, discipline, placement, promotion,
retention, or other high-stakes educational decisions;
4. Student-facing AI tools shall be appropriate to the age and
developmental level of students and shall be used only for clearly
defined educational or instructional purposes;
5. Artificial intelligence tools shall comply with applicable
federal and state student data privacy and security laws including
the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA) and
shall meet recognized industry standards or otherwise stringent
ENR. S. B. NO. 1734 Page 3

private audit and security standards. School districts shall take
reasonable steps to minimize the amount of student data shared with
artificial intelligence tools; and
6. School districts in this state shall address transparency
regarding the instructional use of artificial intelligence including
communication to students and families regarding the role and
limitations of such tools.
F. Each school district shall provide parents or legal
guardians of students enrolled in the district with a written
disclosure not less than annually. The disclosure shall identify:
1. All artificial intelligence tools in use in the district;
2. The vendors providing the artificial intelligence tools;
3. The categories of student data collected;
4. The extent to which student data is shared; and
5. The educational purpose for which each artificial
intelligence tool is used.
G. The parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in a
school district may provide written notice opting the student out of
participating in student-facing AI tools at any time. Students who
opt out shall not be academically penalized or denied access to core
instructional content.
H. The State Department of Education shall develop and make
available guidance regarding the responsible use of artificial
intelligence and emerging technologies for public school districts
in this state.
I. Prior to the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year, each
school district board of education shall adopt and maintain a policy
governing the use of artificial intelligence and emerging
technologies. The policy shall at a minimum:
1. Identify roles or school employees responsible for approving
and overseeing the use of artificial intelligence tools;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1734 Page 4

2. Address appropriate instructional uses and prohibited uses;
3. Address student data protection and data minimization
practices;
4. Address transparency to students and families;
5. Provide for periodic review and updates; and
6. Comply with the provisions set forth in subsection E of this
section and the guidance developed by the State Department of
Education.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
1. Require a public school district in this state to use
artificial intelligence in any school; or
2. Limit the authority of school district boards of education
to make decisions regarding instructional methods or technology use.
K. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1734 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1734 Page 6